Illinois, session 104th, SB4084.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. The sum of $31,820,800, or so much thereof as 6may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 7Fund to meet the ordinary and contingent expenses of the 8Office of the State Comptroller, which includes in part, the 9approximate sum of $250,000 for the Comptroller's Office of 10Inspector General. 11    Section 10. The sum of $1,500,000, or so much thereof as 12may be necessary, is appropriated to the State Comptroller 13from the Comptroller's Administrative Fund for the discharge 14of duties of the office. 15    Section 15. The sum of $50,300, or so much thereof as may 16be necessary, is appropriated to the State Comptroller from 17the State Lottery Fund for expenses in connection with the 18State Lottery. 19    Section 20. The sum of $111,371,200, or so much thereof as 20may be necessary, is appropriated from the Personal Property   SB4084- 2 -SDS104 00055 NBW 10055 b1Tax Replacement Fund to the State Comptroller for ordinary and 2contingent expenses associated with the payment to official 3Court reporters pursuant to law. 4    Section 25. The following named amounts, or so much 5thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated 6from the General Revenue Fund to the State Comptroller to pay 7the elected State officers of the Executive Branch of the 8State Government, at various rates prescribed by law:9  For the Governor....................................245,60010  For the Lieutenant Governor.........................192,10011  For the Secretary of State..........................218,80012  For the Attorney General............................218,80013  For the Comptroller.................................192,10014  For the State Treasurer.............................192,10015    Total                                          $1,259,500 16    Section 30. The following named amounts, or so much 17thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 18the State Comptroller to pay certain appointed officers of the 19Executive Branch of the State Government, at the various rates 20prescribed by law:21From General Revenue Fund:22  Department on Aging23   For the Director...................................197,00024  Department of Central Management Services  SB4084- 3 -SDS104 00055 NBW 10055 b1   For the Director...................................232,8002   For 2 Assistant Directors..........................395,7003  Department of Corrections4   For the Director...................................238,8005   For the Assistant Director.........................203,0006  Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity7   For the Director...................................232,8008   For 2 Assistant Directors..........................395,7009  Environmental Protection Agency10   For the Director...................................214,90011   For the Electric Vehicle Coordinator...............214,90012  Department of Early Childhood13   For the Secretary..................................232,80014   For 2 Assistant Directors..........................395,70015  Department of Human Services16   For the Secretary..................................238,80017   For 3 Assistant Secretaries........................608,80018  Department of Juvenile Justice19   For the Director...................................197,00020  Department of Labor21   For the Director...................................214,90022   For the Assistant Director.........................187,00023   For the Chief Factory Inspector.....................67,00024   For the Superintendent of Safety Inspection25    and Education......................................73,70026  Illinois State Police  SB4084- 4 -SDS104 00055 NBW 10055 b1   For the Director...................................238,8002   For the Assistant Director.........................166,9003  Department of Military Affairs4   For the Adjutant General...........................197,0005   For two Chief Assistants to the6    Adjutant General..................................334,8007  Department of Natural Resources8   For six Mine Officers..............................120,5009  Illinois Labor Relations Board10   For the Chairman...................................133,90011   For four State Labor Relations Board12    members...........................................482,00013   For two Local Labor Relations Board14    members...........................................241,00015   For the Local Labor Relations Board Chairman.......120,50016  Department of Healthcare and Family Services17   For the Director...................................232,80018   For the Assistant Director.........................197,90019  Department of Public Health20   For the Director...................................238,80021   For the Assistant Director.........................203,00022  Department of Revenue23   For the Director...................................232,80024   For the Assistant Director.........................197,90025  Property Tax Appeal Board26   For the Chairman....................................83,000  SB4084- 5 -SDS104 00055 NBW 10055 b1   For four members...................................267,8002  Department of Veterans' Affairs3   For the Director...................................238,8004   For the Assistant Director.........................203,0005  Civil Service Commission6   For the Chairman....................................39,1007   For four members...................................130,0008  Commerce Commission9   For the Chairman...................................172,00010   For four members...................................600,60011  Court of Claims12   For the Chief Judge.................................83,30013   For the six Judges.................................461,20014  Commission on Equity and Inclusion15   For the Chairman...................................160,40016   For six members....................................915,90017  State Board of Elections18   For the Chairman....................................75,00019   For the Vice-Chairman...............................61,60020   For six members....................................289,20021  Department of Human Rights22   For the Director...................................197,00023  Human Rights Commission24   For the Chairman...................................160,40025   For six members....................................915,90026  Liquor Control Commission  SB4084- 6 -SDS104 00055 NBW 10055 b1   For the Chairman....................................50,0002   For six members....................................262,1003   For the Secretary...................................48,2004   For the Chairman and one member as5    designated by law, $200 per diem6    for work on a license appeal7    commission.........................................55,0008  Executive Ethics Commission9   For nine members...................................433,80010  Pollution Control Board11   For the Chairman...................................155,30012   For four members...................................600,60013  Prisoner Review Board14   For the Chairman...................................160,40015   For the Director of Victim and16  Witness Services....................................160,40017   For fourteen members of the18  Prisoner Review Board.............................2,137,10019  Secretary of State Merit Commission20   For the Chairman.........................................021   For four members....................................66,30022  Educational Labor Relations Board23   For the Chairman...................................133,90024   For four members...................................482,00025  Illinois State Police26   For seven members of the State Police  SB4084- 7 -SDS104 00055 NBW 10055 b1    Merit Board, $303 per diem,2    whichever is applicable in accordance3    with law, for a maximum of 1004    days each.........................................212,4005  Firearm Owner's Identification Card Review Board6   For seven members..................................337,4007  Office of Small Business Utility Advocate8   For the small business utility advocate..................09    Total                                         $18,229,000 10    Section 35. The following named sums, or so much thereof 11as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated from the 12General Revenue Fund to the State Comptroller to pay certain 13officers of the Legislative Branch of the State Government, at 14the various rates prescribed by law:15Office of Auditor General16  For the Auditor General.............................219,60017  For two Deputy Auditor Generals.....................316,00018    Total                                            $535,60019  For salaries of the members of the General Assembly, for 20   both the House of Representatives and the Senate; including 21   base salary of $101,450 for each member of the General22   Assembly and additional amounts, as prescribed by law, for23   Speaker of the House, President of the Senate, Minority24   Leader of the House, Minority Leader of the Senate, Speaker25   Pro Tempore of the House, President Pro Tempore of the  SB4084- 8 -SDS104 00055 NBW 10055 b1   Senate, Majority Leaders in both chambers, 10 assistant2   majority and minority leaders in the Senate, 12 assistant3   majority and minority leaders, majority and minority caucus4   chairmen in the Senate, majority and minority conference5   chairmen in the House, 2 Deputy Majority and the 2 Deputy6   Minority leaders in the House, Majority Officer in the7   House, Majority Officer in the Senate, chairmen and8   minority spokesmen of standing committees in the Senate9   (except the Committee on Assignments), and chairmen and10   minority spokesmen of standing committees11   in the House...................................$21,103,70012  For per diem allowances for the13   members of the Senate, as14   provided by law....................................700,00015  For per diem allowances for the16   members of the House, as17   provided by law..................................1,200,00018  For mileage for all members of the19   General Assembly, as provided20   by law.............................................700,00021    Total                                          $2,600,000 22    Section 40. The following named sums, or so much thereof 23as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to the 24State Comptroller to pay certain appointed officers of the 25Executive Branch of the State Government, at the various rates   SB4084- 9 -SDS104 00055 NBW 10055 b1prescribed by law:2Department of Agriculture3  For the Director4   From Illinois State Fair Fund......................214,9005  For the Assistant Director6   From Feed Control Fund.............................187,0007Department of Children and Family Services 8  For the Director9   From DCFS Children's Services Fund.................238,80010Illinois Emergency Management Agency and Office of Homeland 11Security12  For the Director13   From Nuclear Safety Emergency 14   Preparedness Fund .................................214,90015  For the Assistant Director16   From Radiation Protection Fund.....................187,00017Department of Financial and Professional  18 Regulation19  From the Professions Indirect Cost Fund20   For the Secretary..................................232,80021   For the Director...................................214,90022   For the Director...................................214,90023Illinois Power Agency24  For the Director25   From the Illinois Power Agency Operations Fund.....220,90026Department of Insurance  SB4084- 10 -SDS104 00055 NBW 10055 b1  From the Insurance Producer Administration Fund2   For the Director..................................214,900 3   For the Assistant Director.........................187,0004Department of Lottery5   For the Superintendent6    From State Lottery Fund...........................214,9007Department of Natural Resources8  Payable from Park and Conservation Fund9   For the Director...................................214,90010   For the Assistant Director.........................187,00011Department of Transportation12  Payable from Road Fund13   For the Secretary..................................238,80014   For the Assistant Secretary........................203,00015Illinois Workers' Compensation Commission16  Payable from Illinois Workers' Compensation17   Commission Operations Fund18   For the Chairman...................................195,90019   For nine members.................................1,678,50020Office of the State Fire Marshal21  For the State Fire Marshal:22   From Fire Prevention Fund..........................197,00023Department of Gaming Regulation and Enforcement24  From the State Gaming Fund25   For the Executive Director.........................232,80026   For one Assistant director.........................197,900  SB4084- 11 -SDS104 00055 NBW 10055 b1   For one Assistant director.........................197,9002  For eleven members of the Illinois3   Racing Board, $300 per diem to a4   maximum $16,067 as prescribed by law:5   From the Horse Racing Fund.........................176,8006Department of Employment Security 7 Payable from Title III Social Security and 8  Employment Fund:9   For the Director...................................232,80010   For five members of the Board11    of Review..........................................75,00012Department of Innovation and Technology 13 Payable from Technology Management 14  Revolving Fund:15   For the Secretary..................................238,80016   For the Assistant Secretary........................203,00017Department of Financial and Professional Regulation 18 Payable from Real Estate License 19  Administration Fund:20   For the Director...................................214,90021Department of Financial and Professional Regulation 22 Payable from Bank and Trust Company Fund:23  For the Director....................................214,90024Subtotals:25  Feed Control Fund...................................187,00026  DCFS Children's Services Fund.......................238,800  SB4084- 12 -SDS104 00055 NBW 10055 b1  Nuclear Safety Emergency Preparedness Fund..........214,9002  Radiation Protection Fund...........................187,0003  Professions Indirect Cost Fund......................662,6004  Illinois Power Agency Operations Fund...............220,9005  Insurance Producer Administration Fund..............401,9006  State Lottery Fund..................................214,9007  Park and Conservation Fund..........................401,9008  Road Fund...........................................441,8009  Illinois Workers' Compensation10  Commission Operations Fund........................1,874,40011  Illinois State Fair Fund............................214,90012  State Gaming Fund...................................430,70013  Fire Prevention Fund................................197,00014  Horse Racing Fund...................................374,70015  Bank and Trust Company Fund.........................214,90016  Title III Social Security and17   Employment Fund....................................307,80018  Technology Management Revolving Fund................441,80019  Real Estate License Administration Fund.............214,90020    Total                                           7,442,800 21    Section 45. The following named amounts, or so much 22thereof as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 23purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated to the State 24Comptroller in connection with the payment of salaries for 25officers of the Executive and Legislative Branches of State   SB4084- 13 -SDS104 00055 NBW 10055 b1Government:2For State Contribution to State Employees' 3 Retirement System:4  From Horse Racing Fund...............................91,0005  From Fire Prevention Fund............................90,5006  From Bank and Trust Company Fund.....................98,7007  From Title III Social Security8   and Employment Fund................................141,4009  From Feed and Control Fund...........................85,90010  From DCFS Children's Services Fund..................109,70011  From Nuclear Safety Emergency Preparedness Fund......98,70012  From Radiation Protection Fund.......................85,90013  From Illinois State Fair Fund........................98,70014  From State Gaming Fund..............................197,90015  From Professions Indirect Cost Fund.................304,30016  From Illinois Power Agency Operations Fund..........101,50017  From Insurance Producer Administration Fund.........184,60018  From State Lottery Fund..............................98,70019  From Park and Conservation Fund.....................184,60020  From Road Fund......................................202,90021  From Illinois Workers' Compensation22   Commission Operations Fund.........................861,00023  From Technology Management Revolving Fund...........202,90024  From Real Estate License Administration Fund.........98,70025    Total                                          $3,337,60026For State Contribution to Social Security:  SB4084- 14 -SDS104 00055 NBW 10055 b1  From General Revenue Fund.........................1,755,4002  From Horse Racing Fund...............................27,9003  From Fire Prevention Fund............................14,3004  From Bank and Trust Company Fund.....................14,6005  From Title III Social Security6   and Employment Fund.................................20,6007  From Feed Control Fund...............................14,3008  From DCFS Children's Services Fund...................15,0009  From Nuclear Safety Emergency Preparedness Fund......14,60010  From Radiation Protection Fund.......................14,30011  From Professions Indirect Cost Fund..................44,00012  From Illinois Power Agency Operations Fund...........14,70013  From Insurance Producer Administration Fund..........28,90014  From State Lottery Fund..............................14,60015  From Illinois State Fair Fund........................14,60016  From State Gaming Fund...............................29,20017  From Park and Conservation Fund......................28,90018  From Road Fund.......................................29,30019  From Illinois Workers' Compensation20   Commission Operations Fund.........................142,70021  From Technology Management Revolving Fund............29,30022  From Real Estate License Administration Fund.........14,60023    Total                                          $2,281,80024For Group Insurance:25  From Fire Prevention Fund............................35,20026  From Bank and Trust Company Fund.....................35,200  SB4084- 15 -SDS104 00055 NBW 10055 b1  From Title III Social Security and2   Employment Fund.....................................35,2003  From Feed Control Fund...............................35,2004  From DCFS Children's Services Fund...................35,2005  From Nuclear Safety Emergency Preparedness Fund......35,2006  From Radiation Protection Fund.......................35,2007  From Professions Indirect Cost Fund.................105,6008  From Illinois Power Agency Operations Fund...........35,2009  From Insurance Producer Administration Fund..........70,40010  From State Lottery Fund..............................35,20011  From Park and Conservation Fund......................70,40012  From Road Fund.......................................70,40013  From Illinois Workers' Compensation14   Commission Operations Fund.........................352,00015  From Technology Management Revolving Fund............70,40016  From Real Estate License Administration Fund.........35,20017  From Illinois State Fair Fund------------------------35,20018  From State Gaming Fund-------------------------------70,40019  From Horse Racing Fund-------------------------------35,20020    Total                                          $1,232,000 21    Section 50. The following named amounts, or so much 22thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated 23from the General Revenue Fund to the State Comptroller to pay 24certain appointed officers of the Executive Branch of the 25State Government, at the various rates prescribed by law:  SB4084- 16 -SDS104 00055 NBW 10055 b1Executive Inspector Generals2  For the Executive Inspector General for the3   Office of the Governor.............................221,7004  For the Executive Inspector General for the5   Office of the Attorney General.....................176,2006  For the Executive Inspector General for the7   Office of the Secretary of State...................176,2008  For the Executive Inspector General for the9   Office of the Comptroller..........................153,50010  For the Executive Inspector General for the11   Office of the Treasurer............................153,50012    Total                                            $881,100 13    Section 55. The amount of $2,015,400, or so much thereof 14as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 15Fund to the State Comptroller for contingencies in the event 16that any amounts appropriated in Sections 5 through 60 of this 17Article are insufficient. 18ARTICLE 219    Section 99. Effective date. This Act take effect July 1, 202026.